Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

State Veterinarian [Repealed]

43-1-301 — 43-1-305. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-301 — 43-1-305 (Acts 1901, ch. 12, § 1; 1901, ch. 132, § 2; 1913, ch. 16, § 1; 1923, ch. 7, § 30; Code 1932, §§ 298, 5055-5058; Shan.; §§ 2789a23-2789a26; Shan. Supp., § 373a75; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-301 — 44-305, 43-3-101 — 43-3-105, 44-1-101 — 44-1-105), concerning the state veterinarian, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 19.